Florida, session 2026, SB1046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 381.993, Florida Statutes, is created to 18 read: 19 381.993âDevelopmental delays; autism spectrum disorder; 20 detection.â 21 (1)âThe Department of Health, in collaboration with school 22 districts throughout this state, shall develop informational 23 materials for the detection of developmental delays and autism 24 spectrum disorder for parents and guardians of students. The 25 informational materials must be made available to each learning 26 coalition, prekindergarten provider, school district, and 27 charter school through the departmentâs website. 28 (2)âWithin 90 days after July 1, 2026, the department shall 29 develop the materials related to the detection of developmental 30 delays and autism spectrum disorder and post the information on 31 its website. The department shall develop a standardized 32 methodology for each learning coalition, prekindergarten 33 provider, school district, and charter school for the 34 notification of the parents or guardians of voluntary 35 prekindergarten, kindergarten, first grade, and second grade 36 students by September 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, of the 37 availability of the developmental delay and autism spectrum 38 disorder detection materials. 39 (3)âInformation provided to parents and guardians must 40 include, but need not be limited to, all of the following: 41 (a)âA description of developmental delays and a description 42 of autism spectrum disorder. 43 (b)âA description of the signs associated with 44 developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder. 45 (c)âA recommendation for a developmental screening for 46 students displaying signs associated with developmental delays 47 and autism spectrum disorder. 48 (d)âExisting state resources for students identified as at 49 risk for developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder, 50 including, but not limited to, regional sites of the Center for 51 Autism and Related Disabilities and the Early Head Start 52 program. 53 Section 2.âSubsection (5) of section 1002.53, Florida 54 Statutes, is amended to read: 55 1002.53âVoluntary Prekindergarten Education Program; 56 eligibility and enrollment.â 57 (5)âThe early learning coalition shall provide each parent 58 enrolling a child in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 59 Program with a profile of every private prekindergarten provider 60 and public school delivering the program within the county where 61 the child is being enrolled. The profiles must shall be provided 62 to parents in a format prescribed by the department in 63 accordance with s. 1002.92(3). The early learning coalition 64 shall must also annually notify parents and guardians of the 65 availability of informational materials for the early detection 66 of Type 1 diabetes pursuant to s. 381.992 and for the detection 67 of developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder pursuant to 68 s. 381.993. 69 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.